Idaho, session 2026, H0795.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-4101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4101. DEFINITIONS. The following definitions are applicable to
this act:
(A) "Obscene material" means any matter:
(1) Which the average person, applying contemporary community stan-
dards, would find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient
interest; and
(2) Which depicts or describes patently offensive representations or
descriptions of:
(a) Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simu-
lated; or
(b) Masturbation, excretory functions, or lewd exhibition of the
genitals or genital area.
Nothing herein contained is intended to include or proscribe any matter
which, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used,
possesses serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.
In prosecutions under this act, where circumstances of production, pre-
sentation, sale, dissemination, or publicity indicate that the matter is be-
ing commercially exploited by the defendant for the sake of its prurient ap-
peal, such evidence is probative with respect to the nature of the matter and
can justify the conclusion that, in the context in which it is used, the mat-
ter has no serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.
(B) "Prurient interest" means a shameful or morbid interest in nudity,
sex, or excretion, which goes substantially beyond customary limits of can-
dor in description or representation of such matters. If it appears from the
character of the material or the circumstances of its dissemination that the
subject matter is designed for a specially susceptible audience or clearly
defined deviant sexual group, the appeal of the subject matter shall be
judged with reference to such audience or group.
(C) "Matter" or "material" means any book, magazine, newspaper, or
other printed or written material; or any picture, drawing, photograph, mo-
tion picture, or other pictorial representation; or any statue or other fig-
ure; or any recording, transcription, or mechanical, chemical, or electri-
cal reproduction; or any other articles, equipment, machines, or materials.


(D) "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other legal entity; or any agent or servant thereof.
(E) "Distribute" means to transfer possession of, whether with or with-
out consideration, by any means.
(F) "Knowingly" means having actual or constructive knowledge of the
character of the subject matter or live conduct. A person shall be deemed to
have constructive knowledge of the character of the subject matter or live
conduct if he has knowledge of facts which would put a reasonable and prudent
man on notice as to the suspect nature of the matter, and the failure to in-
spect the contents is either for the purpose of avoiding such disclosure or
is due to reckless conduct.
(G) "Reckless conduct" is conduct which consciously disregards a sub-
stantial and unjustifiable risk that matter may be obscene. The risk must be
of such a nature and degree that, considering the nature and purpose of the
actor's conduct and the circumstances known to him, its disregard involves
a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that an average law-abiding
person would observe in the actor's situation under like circumstances.
(H) "Exhibit" means to show or display.
(I) "Obscene live conduct" means any physical human body activity,
whether performed or engaged in alone or with other persons, including but
not limited to singing, speaking, dancing, acting, simulating, or pantomim-
ing, where:
(1) The average person, applying contemporary community standards,
would find such conduct, when considered as a whole, appeals to the
prurient interest; and
(2) The conduct is patently offensive because it consists of:
(a) Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simu-
lated; or
(b) Masturbation, excretory functions, or lewd exhibition of the
genitals or genital area.
Nothing herein contained is intended to include or proscribe any con-
duct which, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is
used, possesses serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.
In prosecutions under this act, where circumstances of production, presen-
tation, advertising, or exhibition indicate that live conduct is being com-
mercially exploited by the defendant for the sake of its prurient appeal,
such evidence is probative with respect to the nature of the conduct and can
justify the conclusion that, in the context in which it is used, the matter
has no serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value. Nothing
herein contained is intended to include or proscribe the breastfeeding of a
child or the expression of breast milk for the purpose of feeding a child.
SECTION 2. That Section 52-103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
52-103. MORAL NUISANCES -- DEFINITIONS. As used in title 52, Idaho
Code, relating to moral nuisances.
(A) "Knowledge" or "knowledge of such nuisance" means having knowledge
of the contents and character of the patently offensive sexual conduct which
appears in the lewd matter, or knowledge of the acts of lewdness, assigna-
tion, or prostitution which occur on the premises.


(B) "Lewd matter" is synonymous with "obscene matter" and means any
matter:
(1) which the average person, applying contemporary community stan-
dards, would find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient
interest; and
(2) which depicts or describes patently offensive representations or
descriptions of:
(a) ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simu-
lated; or
(b) masturbation, excretory functions, or lewd exhibition of the
genitals or genital area.
Nothing herein contained is intended to include or proscribe any matter
which, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used,
possesses serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.
(C) "Lewdness" shall have and include all those meanings which are as-
signed to it under the common law.
(D) "Matter" means a motion picture film or a publication or both.
(E) "Moral Nuisance" means a nuisance which is injurious to public
morals.
(F) "Motion picture film" shall include any:
(1) film or plate negative;
(2) film or plate positive;
(3) film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition;
(4) films, glass slides or transparencies, either in negative or posi-
tive form, designed for exhibition by projection on a screen.
(5) video tape or any other medium used to electronically reproduce im-
ages on a screen.
(G) "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other legal entity.
(H) "Place" includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure or
places, or any separate part or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or
the ground itself.
(I) "Publication" shall include any book, magazine, article, pamphlet,
writing, printing, illustration, picture, sound recording, or a motion pic-
ture film which is offered for sale or exhibited in a coin-operated machine.
(J) "Sale" means a passing of title or right of possession from a seller
to a buyer for valuable consideration, and shall include, but is not limited
to, any lease or rental arrangement or other transaction wherein or whereby
any valuable consideration is received for the use of, or transfer or posses-
sion of, lewd matter.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.